New Mexico, session 2026, SB249.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--One million dollars ($1,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the attorney general for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to continue and further the work of the missing and murdered indigenous peoples task force. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .233675.1